Maryland, session 2026, SB0656.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That Section(s) 21–259.3 of Article – Health – General of the Annotated Code of Maryland
be renumbered to be Section(s) 21–259.4.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the Laws of Maryland read
as follows:
Article – Commercial Law
13–301.
Unfair, abusive, or deceptive trade practices include any:
(14) Violation of a provision of:
(xlvii) Title 14, Subtitle 50 of this article; [or]
(xlviii) Section 13–411.1(c)(2) of the Transportation Article; or
(XLIX) SECTION 21–259.2 OF THE HEALTH – GENERAL
ARTICLE; OR
Article – Health – General
21–101.
(a) In this title the following words have the meanings indicated.
(e) (1) “Cosmetic” means any substance, or any component of a substance, that
is intended to be rubbed, poured, sprinkled, or sprayed on, introduced into, or otherwise

SENATE BILL 656
applied to the human body for cleansing, beautifying, promoting attractiveness, or altering
appearance.
(2) “Cosmetic” does not include soap.
21–259.2.
(a) In this section:
(1) “Ingredient” means any single chemical entity or mixture used as a
component in the manufacture of a cosmetic product; and
(2) “Ingredient” does not include an incidental ingredient, as described in
21 C.F.R. § 701.3(l).
(b) Except as provided in subsection (c) of this section, a person may not
knowingly manufacture, sell, deliver, hold, or offer for sale in the State a cosmetic product
that contains any of the following intentionally added ingredients:
(1) Dibutyl phthalate (CAS no. 84–74–2);
(2) Diethylhexyl phthalate (CAS no. 117–81–7);
(3) Formaldehyde (CAS no. 50–00–0);
(4) Paraformaldehyde (CAS no. 30525–89–4);
(5) Methylene glycol (CAS no. 463–57–0);
(6) Quaternium–15 (CAS no. 51229–78–8);
(7) Mercury (CAS no. 7439–97–6);
(8) Isobutylparaben (CAS no. 4247–02–3);
(9) Isopropylparaben (CAS no. 4191–73–5);
(10) m–Phenylenediamine and its salts (CAS no. 108–45–2);
(11) o–Phenylenediamine and its salts (CAS no. 95–54–5); or
(12) The following per– and polyfluoroalkyl substances (PFAS) and their
salts:
(i) Perfluorooctane sulfonate (PFOS) or
heptadecafluorooctane–1–sulfonic acid (CAS no. 1763–23–1);

SENATE BILL 656 5
(ii) Potassium perfluorooctanesulfonate or potassium
heptadecafluorooctane–1–sulfonate (CAS no. 2795–39–3);
(iii) Diethanolamine perfluorooctane sulfonate (CAS no.
70225–14–8);
(iv) Ammonium perfluorooctane sulfonate or ammonium
heptadecafluorooctanesulfonate (CAS no. 29081–56–9);
(v) Lithium perfluorooctane sulfonate or lithium
heptadecafluorooctanesulfonate (CAS no. 29457–72–5);
(vi) Perfluorooctanoic acid (PFOA) (CAS no. 335–67–1);
(vii) Ammonium pentadecafluorooctanoate (CAS no. 3825–26–1);
(viii) Nonadecafluorodecanoic acid (CAS no. 335–76–2);
(ix) Ammonium nonadecafluorodecanoate (CAS no. 3108–42–7);
(x) Sodium nonadecafluorodecanoate (CAS no. 3830–45–3);
(xi) Perfluorononanoic acid (PFNA) (CAS no. 375–95–1);
(xii) Sodium heptadecafluorononanoate (CAS no. 21049–39–8); or
(xiii) Ammonium perfluorononanoate (CAS no. 4149–60–4).
(c) A person is not in violation of this section if the person manufactures, sells,
delivers, holds, or offers for sale in the State a cosmetic product that:
(1) Was manufactured through a process intended to comply with this
section; and
(2) Contains a technically unavoidable trace quantity of an ingredient
listed in subsection (b) of this section due to:
(i) An impurity of a natural or synthetic ingredient;
(ii) The manufacturing process;
(iii) Storage; or
(iv) Packaging.

SENATE BILL 656
(D) (1) IN ADDITION TO ANY OTHER PENALTIES UNDER THIS TITLE, A
PERSON WHO VIOLATES THIS SECTION IS LIABLE FOR CIVIL DAMAGES RESULTING
FROM ACTUAL HARM SUSTAINED BY THE INDIVIDUAL RESULTING FROM THE
VIOLATION.
(2) AN ACTION UNDER THIS SECTION MUST BE BROUGHT WITHIN 3
YEARS AFTER THE DATE ON WHICH THE PLAINTIFF DISCOVERED OR REASONABLY
SHOULD HAVE DISCOVERED THAT THE EXPOSURE TO AN INGREDIENT IN VIOLATION
OF THIS SECTION WAS THE PROXIMATE CAUSE OF THE INJURY SUSTAINED BY THE
PLAINTIFF.
(3) IN ANY ACTION BROUGHT TO ENFORCE THIS SECTION, A COURT
MAY AWARD REASONABLE ATTORNEY’S FEES TO A PREVAILING PLAINTIFF:
(I) TREBLE DAMAGES;
(II) IF THE VIOLATION WAS WILLFUL, PUNITIVE DAMAGES; AND
(III) REASONABLE ATTORNEY’S FEES.
(E) (1) THE DEPARTMENT MAY INVESTIGATE ANY COMPLAINT ALLEGING
THAT A PERSON HAS VIOLATED THIS SECTION.
(2) ON RECEIPT OF A COMPLAINT, A REPRESENTATIVE OF THE
DEPARTMENT, AT A REASONABLE TIME, MAY ENTER AND INSPECT THE PREMISES OF
THE PERSON LOCATED IN THE STATE TO DETERMINE COMPLIANCE WITH THIS
SECTION.
(3) THE PERSON MAY NOT:
(I) REFUSE TO GRANT ACCESS TO A REPRESENTATIVE WHO
REQUESTS TO ENTER AND INSPECT THE PREMISES OF THE PERSON UNDER
PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION; OR
(II) INTERFERE WITH AN INSPECTION UNDER PARAGRAPH (2)
OF THIS SUBSECTION.
(4) AN INVESTIGATION OF A PREMISES OF A PERSON CONDUCTED
UNDER THIS SUBSECTION MAY INCLUDE SAMPLING OF A COSMETIC PRODUCT TO
DETERMINE IF THE COSMETIC PRODUCT CONTAINS A TECHNICALLY UNAVOIDABLE
TRACE QUANTITY OF AN INGREDIENT LISTED IN SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION.
21–259.3.

SENATE BILL 656 7
(A) IN THIS SECTION, “FUND” MEANS THE HARMFUL HAIR CHEMICAL
RESTITUTION FUND.
(B) THERE IS A HARMFUL HAIR CHEMICAL RESTITUTION FUND.
(C) THE PURPOSE OF THE FUND IS TO SUPPORT THE RESEARCH AND
TREATMENT, INCLUDING SCREENINGS AND DIAGNOSIS, OF FIBROIDS, UTERINE
CANCER, HAIR LOSS, AND RELATED CONDITIONS CAUSED BY HARMFUL HAIR
CHEMICALS.
(D) THE ATTORNEY GENERAL SHALL ADMINISTER THE FUND.
(E) (1) THE FUND IS A SPECIAL, NONLAPSING FUND THAT IS NOT
SUBJECT TO § 7–302 OF THE STATE FINANCE AND PROCUREMENT ARTICLE.
(2) THE STATE TREASURER SHALL HOLD THE FUND SEPARATELY,
AND THE COMPTROLLER SHALL ACCOUNT FOR THE FUND.
(F) THE FUND CONSISTS OF:
(1) ALL FUNDS, EXCLUDING FUNDS RECEIVED BY THE AGGRIEVED
PARTY AND THE COSTS OF THE ACTION THE ATTORNEY GENERAL IS ENTITLED TO
RECOVER, RECEIVED BY THE DIVISION OF CONSUMER PROTECTION IN THE OFFICE
OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL FROM ENFORCING § 21–259.2 OF THIS SUBTITLE
UNDER THE CONSUMER PROTECTION ACT; AND
(2) INTEREST EARNINGS OF THE FUND.
(G) (1) THE FUND SHALL BE USED FOR:
(I) PROVIDING GRANTS FOR THE SUPPORT OF THE RESEARCH
AND TREATMENT, INCLUDING SCREENINGS AND DIAGNOSIS, OF FIBROIDS, UTERINE
CANCER, HAIR LOSS, AND RELATED CONDITIONS CAUSED BY HARMFUL HAIR
CHEMICALS;
(II) CARRYING OUT ANY LAWS ENACTED TO BENEFIT VICTIMS
OF A VIOLATION OF § 21–259.2 OF THIS SUBTITLE; AND
(III) PROVIDING RESTITUTION TO VICTIMS OF A VIOLATION OF §
21–259.2 OF THIS SUBTITLE.
(2) TO QUALIFY FOR A GRANT FROM THE FUND, AN APPLICANT FOR A
GRANT UNDER PARAGRAPH (1)(I) OF THIS SUBSECTION SHALL BE REQUIRED TO:

SENATE BILL 656
(I) FILE A COMPLAINT WITH THE ATTORNEY GENERAL FOR A
VIOLATION OF § 21–259.2 OF THIS SUBTITLE; AND
(II) HAVE SUSTAINED HARM AS A RESULT OF A VIOLATION OF §
21–259.2 OF THIS SUBTITLE.
(H) (1) THE STATE TREASURER SHALL INVEST THE MONEY OF THE FUND
IN THE SAME MANNER AS OTHER STATE MONEY MAY BE INVESTED.
(2) ANY INTEREST EARNINGS OF THE FUND SHALL BE CREDITED TO
THE FUND.
(I) EXPENDITURES FROM THE FUND MAY BE MADE ONLY IN ACCORDANCE
WITH THE STATE BUDGET.
(J) MONEY EXPENDED FROM THE FUND FOR THE SUPPORT OF RESEARCH
AND TREATMENT UNDER SUBSECTION (G) OF THIS SECTION IS SUPPLEMENTAL TO
AND IS NOT INTENDED TO TAKE THE PLACE OF FUNDING THAT OTHERWISE WOULD
BE APPROPRIATED FOR THE SUPPORT OF RESEARCH AND TREATMENT.
Article – State Finance and Procurement
6–226.
(a) (2) (i) This paragraph does not apply in fiscal years 2024 through 2028.
(ii) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, and unless
inconsistent with a federal law, grant agreement, or other federal requirement or with the
terms of a gift or settlement agreement, net interest on all State money allocated by the
State Treasurer under this section to special funds or accounts, and otherwise entitled to
receive interest earnings, as accounted for by the Comptroller, shall accrue to the General
Fund of the State.
(iii) The provisions of subparagraph (ii) of this paragraph do not
apply to the following funds:
212. the Department of Social and Economic Mobility Special
Fund; [and]
213. the Population Health Improvement Fund; AND
214. THE HARMFUL HAIR CHEMICALS RESTITUTION
FUND.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That:

SENATE BILL 656 9
(a) (1) The Maryland Department of Health, in conjunction with the Office of
the Attorney General, shall develop a plan for the administration of a special fund to support
the research and treatment, including screenings and diagnosis, of fibroids, uterine cancer,
hair loss, and related conditions caused by harmful hair chemicals that consists of:
(i) all funds, excluding funds received by the aggrieved party and the
costs of the action the Attorney General is entitled to recover, received by the Division of
Consumer Protection in the Office of the Attorney General from enforcing § 21–259.2 of the
Health – General Article under the Consumer Protection Act; and
(ii) interest earnings of the fund.
(2) The plan developed under paragraph (1) of this subsection shall include
the best method of using the money in the fund to achieve the purpose of the special fund.
(b) On or before December 1, 2026, the Maryland Department of Health, in
conjunction with the Office of the Attorney General, shall report the plan developed under
subsection (a) of this section to the Senate Finance Committee and the House Health
Committee, in accordance with § 2–1257 of the State Government Article.
SECTION 2. 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
July 1, 2026.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.